Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB476.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.12-205 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an independent, de jure corporation of the Commonwealth
with all the general corporate powers incidental thereto which shall be known as the
"Bluegrass State Skills Corporation." The corporation shall be a political
subdivision of the state and shall be attached to the Cabinet for Economic
Development.
(2) The corporation is created and established to improve and promote the employment
opportunities of the citizens of the Commonwealth by creating and expanding
programs of skills training and education which meet the needs of qualified
companies.
(3) The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of seventeen
(17) members, including the following five (5) ex officio members: the
commissioner of the Department of Workforce Development or his or her designee,
the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development, the secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet, the president of the Council on Postsecondary
Education, and the president of the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System. The twelve (12) other members shall be appointed by the Governor,
including persons having knowledge and experience in business and industry, skills
training, education, and minority employment; and at least one (1) of the twelve
(12) members shall be appointed to represent labor organizations. Each member
appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of four (4) years, except that in
making the initial appointments, the Governor shall appoint three (3) members to
serve for one (1) year, three (3) members to serve for two (2) years, three (3)
members to serve for three (3) years, and three (3) members to serve for four (4)
years. All succeeding appointments shall be for a term of four (4) years.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1640
(4) In the event of a vacancy, the Governor may appoint a replacement member who
shall hold office during the remainder of the term so vacated.
(5) Any member may be removed from his or her appointment by the Governor for
cause.
(6) The Governor shall designate a member of the board as its chairman.
(7) Members of the board of directors of the corporation, except for ex officio
members, shall be entitled to compensation for their services in the amount of one
hundred dollars ($100) for each regular or special called meeting of the corporation,
and all members shall be entitled to reimbursement for any actual and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.
(8) The board of directors of the corporation shall annually elect a vice chairman, a
secretary, and a treasurer. The secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of
the corporation and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed
with the corporation, and its official seal.
(9) The Cabinet for Economic Development shall provide staff and support services to
the corporation and shall direct and supervise its administrative affairs and general
management subject to the policies, control, and direction of the board.
(10) All officers and employees of the corporation having access to its funding shall give
bond to the corporation, at its expense, in the amount and with the surety as the
board may prescribe.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:12 AM Jacketed